Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 11 Prevention of Public Offenses
12-12-1715. Rights of subject of report — Investigative determination of the Department of Human Services — Notice of finding — Appeal.

Upon completion of an investigation, the Department of Human Services shall determine that an allegation of adult maltreatment or long-term care facility maltreatment is either:

(A)Unfounded, a finding that shall be entered if the allegation is not supported by a preponderance of the evidence.

The department shall hold the administrative hearing at a reasonable place and time.

For an incident occurring in a long-term care facility, the department may not make a finding that an offender has neglected a long-term care facility resident if the offender demonstrates that the neglect was caused by factors beyond the control of the offender.

A delay in completing the administrative hearing process that is attributable to the offender shall not count against the time limit in subdivision (c)(1) of this section.

Failure to complete the administrative hearing process in a timely fashion shall not prevent the department or a court from:

The offender;

The current administrator of the long-term care facility if the incident occurred in a long-term care facility;

The administrator of the long-term care facility that currently employs the offender if different from the long-term care facility in which the incident occurred;

The appropriate licensing authority;

The registry;

The maltreated person or the legal guardian of the maltreated person; and

If required under §21-15-110, the employer of any offender if the offender is in a designated position with a state agency.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1812, § 1; 2009, No. 525, § 3; 2011, No. 1139, § 1; 2013, No. 584, § 5.

12-12-1716. Adult and Long-term Care Facility Resident Maltreatment Central Registry.

The registry shall contain investigative determinations made by the department on all founded reports of adult maltreatment and long-term care facility resident maltreatment.

An offender's name shall be placed in the registry if:

The department may also charge a reasonable fee for reproducing copies of tapes and photographs maintained under this subchapter.

No fee may be charged to a nonprofit or volunteer agency that requests a search of the investigative files maintained under this subchapter.

No fee may be charged under this subchapter to a person who is indigent.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1812, § 1; 2009, No. 525, § 4.

12-12-1717. Availability of founded reports of adult or long-term care facility resident maltreatment.

A physician who has before him or her an endangered person or an impaired person the physician reasonably believes may have been maltreated;

A person authorized to place the adult in protective custody if the person:

(1)Under no circumstances may the information contained in the registry be released to a person unless the person's capacity is confirmed by the department.

Except for the subject of the report, no person or agency to whom disclosure is made may disclose to any other person or agency a report or other information obtained under this section.

(1)The department may not release data that would identify the person who made a report except to law enforcement, a prosecuting attorney, or the office of the Attorney General.

A court of competent jurisdiction may order release of data that would identify the person who made a report after the court has reviewed in camera the record related to the report and has found that disclosure is needed:

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1812, § 1; 2007, No. 283, § 9; 2009, No. 165, § 11; 2011, No. 206, § 8; 2013, No. 584, §§ 6–9; 2015, No. 1214, §§ 5, 6.

12-12-1718. Availability of screened-out, pending, and unfounded reports.

The department, including the committee;

A law enforcement agency;

A prosecuting attorney;

The office of the Attorney General;

Any applicable licensing or registering authority;

Any person named as a subject of the report or that person's legal guardian;

A circuit court having jurisdiction pursuant to a petition for emergency, temporary, long-term protective custody, or protective services;

A grand jury or court, upon a finding that the information in the record is necessary for the determination of an issue before the grand jury or court;

A person or provider identified by the department as having services needed by the person;

Any employer, legal entity, or board responsible for the person named as the offender;

Any legal entity or board responsible for the maltreated person; and

The Office of Medicaid Inspector General.

Upon conviction, any person disclosing information in violation of this subsection is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.

A court of competent jurisdiction may order release of data that would identify the person who made a report after the court has reviewed in camera the record related to the report and has found that disclosure is needed:

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1812, § 1; 2007, No. 283, § 10; 2009, No. 525, § 5; 2013, No. 584, §§ 10–12; 2015, No. 1214, § 7.

12-12-1719. Delegation of authority.

The Secretary of the Department of Human Services may assign responsibilities for administering the various duties imposed upon the Department of Human Services under this subchapter to respective divisions of the department that in the secretary's opinion are best able to render service or administer the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1812, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §
5155.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Human Services” for “Director of the Department of Human Services” and “secretary's” for “director’s”.

12-12-1720. Penalties.

A person commits the offense of failure to report under this subchapter in the first degree if he or she:

Is a mandated reporter under § 12-12-1708;

Has observed or has reasonable cause to suspect that an endangered person or impaired person has been subjected to conditions or circumstances that constitute adult maltreatment or long-term care facility resident maltreatment; and

Knowingly fails to report or cause a report to be made to the adult and long-term care facility resident maltreatment hotline.

Failure to report under this subchapter in the first degree is a Class B misdemeanor.

A person commits the offense of failure to report in the second degree if he or she:

Is a mandated reporter under § 12-12-1708;

Has observed or has reasonable cause to suspect that an endangered person or impaired person has been subjected to conditions or circumstances that constitute adult maltreatment or long-term care facility resident maltreatment; and

Knowingly fails to make a report or cause a report to be made in the manner and time provided in this subchapter to the adult and long-term care facility resident maltreatment hotline.

Failure to report in the second degree is a Class C misdemeanor.

A person or caregiver required by this subchapter to report a case of suspected adult maltreatment or long-term care facility resident maltreatment who purposely fails to do so is civilly liable for damages proximately caused by the failure.

A person commits the offense of false reporting of adult abuse if he or she purposely makes a false report to the adult and long-term care facility resident maltreatment hotline knowing the allegation in the false report to be false.

For a first offense, false reporting of adult abuse is a Class A misdemeanor.

For a subsequent offense, false reporting of adult abuse is a Class D felony.

A person commits the offense of unlawful disclosure of data or information under this subchapter if:

He or she purposely discloses data or information to a person to whom disclosure is not permitted under § 12-12-1717 or § 12-12-1718; or

He or she purposely encourages or permits the release of data or information to a person to whom disclosure is not permitted under § 12-12-1717 or § 12-12-1718.

Unlawful disclosure of data or information under this subchapter is a Class A misdemeanor.

A person commits the offense of failure to report a death under this subchapter if he or she:

Is required to report a death under § 12-12-1709;

Has reasonable cause to suspect that an adult or long-term care facility resident has died as a result of maltreatment; and

Knowingly fails to make the report in the time and manner required under this subchapter.

Failure to report a death under this subchapter is a Class C misdemeanor.

A.C.R.C. Notes. This section was amended by both Acts 2009, No. 165, §12, and Acts 2009, No. 525, §6. Except for present subsection (c) of this section, this section is codified as amended by Acts 2009, No. 525, §6, pursuant to §1-2-207(b) and Acts 2009, No. 165, §62. The amendments by Acts 2009, No. 165, §12, and Acts No. 525, §6, to present subsection (c) of this section were not in conflict.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment by No. 165, throughout the section, substituted “knowingly” for “willfully” and “upon conviction is” for “shall be”; substituted “violating subsection (c) of this section” for “making false allegations” in (d); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 525 rewrote the section.

The 2017 amendment deleted (b)(1)(C)(ii); redesignated former (b)(1)(C)(i) as (b)(1)(C); and inserted “or cause a report to be made” in (b)(1)(C).

Additional maltreatment to the endangered person or impaired person; or

Removal of the endangered person or impaired person from the home.

Services provided by the department shall be relevant to the needs of the endangered person or impaired person.

If at any time during the protective services case the department determines that the endangered person or impaired person cannot safely remain at home, the department shall take steps to remove the endangered person or impaired person under custody under the Arkansas Adult Maltreatment Custody Act, § 9-20-101 et seq.

Upon request, the department shall be provided a copy of the results of radiology procedures, videotapes, photographs, medical records, or financial records on an endangered person or impaired person if the department has an open protective services case.

If the report of adult maltreatment is deemed unfounded, the department may offer supportive services to the alleged endangered person or impaired person.

An alleged endangered person or impaired person may accept or reject supportive services at any time.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “founded or unfounded” for “true or unsubstantiated” in the section heading; substituted “to be founded” for “to be true” in (a); and substituted “unfounded” for “unsubstantiated” in (e).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1812, § 1; 2009, No. 165, § 12; 2009, No. 525, § 6; 2017, No. 250, § 8.

12-12-1721. Reports as evidence.

A written report from a person or official required by this subchapter to report shall be admissible in evidence in any proceeding relating to adult maltreatment or long-term care facility resident maltreatment.

The affidavit of a physician, psychiatrist, psychologist, or licensed certified social worker shall be admissible in evidence in any proceeding relating to adult maltreatment or long-term care facility resident maltreatment.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1812, § 1.

12-12-1722. Services available on investigative finding of founded or unfounded.

If an investigation under this subchapter is determined to be founded, the Department of Human Services may open a protective services case.

(1)If the department opens a protective services case under this section, the department shall provide services to the endangered person or impaired person in an effort to prevent:

History.

Acts 2011, No. 206, § 9; 2013, No. 584, §§ 13, 14.

12-12-1723. Rules.

The Secretary of the Department of Human Services may adopt rules to implement this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 584, § 15; 2019, No. 910, §
5156.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Human Services” for “Director of the Department of Human Services”.

Subchapter 18

— Automatic License Plate Reader System Act

12-12-1801. Title.

This subchapter is known and may be cited as the “Automatic License Plate Reader System Act”.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1491, § 1.

12-12-1802. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Alert” means data held by the Office of Motor Vehicle, the Arkansas Crime Information Center including without limitation the Arkansas Crime Information Center's Missing Persons Information Clearinghouse, the National Crime Information Center, and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Kidnappings and Missing Persons database;

“Automatic license plate reader system” means a system of one (1) or more mobile or fixed automated high-speed cameras used in combination with computer algorithms to convert images of license plates into computer-readable data;

“Captured plate data” means the global positioning device coordinates, date and time, photograph, license plate number, and any other data captured by or derived from any automatic license plate reader system.

Captured plate data shall not include any personal data;

“Governmental entity” means a lawfully created branch, department, or agency of the federal, state, or local government; and

“Secured area” means an area, enclosed by clear boundaries, to which access is limited and not open to the public, and entry is obtainable only through specific access-control points.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1491, § 1.

12-12-1803. Restrictions on use.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, it is unlawful for an individual, partnership, corporation, association, or the State of Arkansas, its agencies, and political subdivisions to use an automatic license plate reader system.

An automatic license plate reader system may be used:

By a state, county, or municipal law enforcement agency for the comparison of captured plate data with data held by the Office of Motor Vehicle, the Arkansas Crime Information Center, the National Crime Information Center, a database created by law enforcement for the purposes of an ongoing investigation, and the Federal Bureau of Investigation for any lawful purpose;

By parking enforcement entities for regulating the use of parking facilities;

For the purpose of controlling access to secured areas; or

By the Arkansas Highway Police Division of the Arkansas Department of Transportation for the electronic verification of registration, logs, and other compliance data to provide more efficient movement of commercial vehicles on a state highway.

An automatic license plate reader system used under subdivision (b)(4)(A) of this section shall be installed at an entrance ramp at a weigh station facility for the review of a commercial motor vehicle entering the weigh station facility.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added (b)(4).

The 2017 amendment by No. 250 inserted the second occurrence of “weigh station” in (b)(4)(B).

The 2017 amendmentby No. 707 substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (b)(4)(A).

ALR.

Use of License Plate Readers, 32 A.L.R.7th Art. 8 (2018).

Companies lacked standing to sue the Governor and Attorney General challenging the constitutionality of the Automatic License Plate Reader System Act, §12-12-1801 et seq., because the injury of which the companies complained was not “fairly traceable” to either official. The Act provides for enforcement only through private actions for damages; and the Governor and Attorney General do not have authority to enforce the Act.Digital Recognition Network, Inc. v. Hutchinson, 803 F.3d 952 (8th Cir. 2015).

Captured plate data obtained for the purposes described under § 12-12-1803(b) shall not be used or shared for any other purpose and shall not be preserved for more than one hundred fifty (150) days.

Captured plate data obtained by an entity under § 12-12-1803(b)(1) may be retained as part of an ongoing investigation and shall be destroyed at the conclusion of either:

A governmental entity that uses an automatic license plate reader system under § 12-12-1803(b)(1) shall update the captured plate data collected under this subchapter every twenty-four (24) hours if updates are available.

Except as provided under subdivision (d)(2) of this section, a governmental entity authorized to use an automatic license plate reader system under § 12-12-1803(b) shall not sell, trade, or exchange captured plate data for any purpose.

Captured plate data obtained by a law enforcement agency under § 12-12-1803(b)(1) that indicates evidence of an offense may be shared with other law enforcement agencies.

For each check of captured plate data against a list:

The number of confirmed matches;

The number of matches that upon further investigation did not correlate to an alert; and

The number of matches that resulted in arrest and prosecution; and

Promulgate rules and policies concerning the manner and method of obtaining, retaining, and destroying captured plate data, including without limitation specific rules and policies concerning retention of material in excess of one hundred fifty (150) days under § 12-12-1804(b) and make those rules and policies available for public inspection.

Failure to comply with subdivision (b)(4)(A) of this section shall be grounds for a court of competent jurisdiction to exclude any evidence obtained under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1491, § 1; 2015, No. 849, § 1; 2017, No. 250, § 9; 2017, No. 707, § 18.

12-12-1804. Protections.

An investigation that does not result in any criminal charges being filed; or

Any criminal action undertaken in the matter involving the captured plate data.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1491, § 1.

12-12-1805. Practice and usage data preservation.

An entity that uses an automatic license plate reader system under §12-12-1803(b) shall:

Compile statistical data identified in subsection (b) of this section every six (6) months into a format sufficient to allow the general public to review the compiled data; and

Preserve the compiled data for eighteen (18) months.

The preserved data shall include:

The number of license plates scanned;

The names of the lists against which captured plate data were checked;

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1491, § 1.

12-12-1806. Use of data and data-derived evidence.

Captured plate data and evidence derived from it shall not be received in evidence in any trial, hearing, or other proceeding before any court, grand jury, department, officer, agency, regulatory body, legislative committee, or other authority of the state or a political subdivision of the state if the disclosure of that information would be in violation of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1491, § 1.

12-12-1807. Penalties.

A person who violates this subchapter shall be subject to legal action for damages to be brought by any other person claiming that a violation of this subchapter has injured his or her business, person, or reputation.

A person so injured shall be entitled to actual damages or liquidated damages of one thousand dollars ($1,000), whichever is greater, and other costs of litigation.

Companies lacked standing to sue the Governor and Attorney General challenging the constitutionality of the Automatic License Plate Reader System Act, §12-12-1801 et seq., because the injury of which the companies complained was not “fairly traceable” to either official. The Act provides for enforcement only through private actions for damages; and the Governor and Attorney General do not have authority to enforce the Act.Digital Recognition Network, Inc. v. Hutchinson, 803 F.3d 952 (8th Cir. 2015).

While the Attorney General may intervene and defend the constitutionality of the Automatic License Plate Reader System Act, §12-12-1801 et seq., in a private damages suit, the Attorney General does not initiate enforcement or seek relief against a putative defendant. Thus, the companies'injury was “fairly traceable” only to the private civil litigants who may seek damages under the Act and thereby enforce the statute against the companies. For the same reasons, it was not likely that the companies'injury would be “redressed by a favorable decision.”Digital Recognition Network, Inc. v. Hutchinson, 803 F.3d 952 (8th Cir. 2015).

Collection and dissemination of license-plate data prohibited by the Automatic License Plate Reader System Act, §12-12-1801 et seq., was not consumer-oriented, and thus did not constitute an unconscionable act subject to the Attorney General's enforcement authority under the Deceptive Trade Practices Act, §4-88-101 et seq.Digital Recognition Network, Inc. v. Hutchinson, 803 F.3d 952 (8th Cir. 2015).

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1491, § 1.

12-12-1808. Privacy.

(1)Captured plate data or data obtained from the Office of Motor Vehicle may be disclosed only:

To the person to whom the vehicle is registered;

After the written consent of the person to whom the vehicle is registered; or

If the disclosure of the data is permitted by the Driver's Privacy Protection Act of 1994, 18 U.S.C. § 2721 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2013.

Practice and usage data compiled and preserved under §12-12-1806 are a public record for purposes of the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq.

Upon the presentation to an appropriate governmental entity of a valid, outstanding protection order protecting the driver of a vehicle jointly registered with or registered solely in the name of the individual against whom the order was issued, captured plate data shall not be disclosed except as the result of a match under §12-12-1803(b).

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1491, § 1.

Subchapter 19

— Location Information of Wireless Telecommunications Device and Geolocation of Internet Protocol Address in Emergency Situation

12-12-1901. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Commercial mobile radio service” means a commercial mobile service under 47 U.S.C. § 151 et seq., Federal Communications Commission rules, and the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1993, Pub. L. No. 103-66;

“Contact information” means the name of a person or a compilation of names of persons who can immediately respond to and facilitate a request for location information from a public safety agency at any time;

“Geolocation” means the identification or estimation of a geographic location of an internet-enabled device connected to a computer network;

“Internet protocol (IP) address” means a numerical label assigned to each device connected to a computer network that uses internet protocol for communication;

“Law enforcement agency” means the Division of Arkansas State Police, the Attorney General's office, a prosecuting attorney's office, a county sheriff's department, a municipal police department, or a state agency with a law enforcement division;

“Location information” means cell site or other geographic location estimate information in possession of a commercial mobile radio service provider; and

“Public safety agency” means an agency that provides firefighting, law enforcement, medical, or other emergency services.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment inserted “and Geolocation of Internet Protocol Address” in the subchapter heading; added (3) and (4) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; added “or a state agency with a law enforcement division” in (5); and made stylistic changes.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 405, § 1; 2019, No. 584, §
1.

12-12-1902. Commercial mobile radio service or internet service provider to provide information upon request.

Upon request of a law enforcement agency, a commercial mobile radio service provider shall provide location information of a wireless telecommunications device and an internet service provider shall provide geolocation information of an internet protocol (IP) address to the law enforcement agency, in the most expeditious manner reasonably available to the internet service provider, in order that the law enforcement agency may respond to a call for emergency services or to an emergency situation that involves the risk of death or serious physical harm.

This section does not prohibit a commercial mobile radio service provider or an internet service provider from establishing protocols by which the commercial mobile radio service provider or the internet service provider may voluntarily disclose location information or geolocation information.

Within five (5) days of providing location information or geolocation information to a requesting law enforcement agency, a commercial mobile radio service provider or an internet service provider that supplied the law enforcement agency with location information or geolocation information under this subchapter may request, and the law enforcement agency shall provide, the court order, subpoena, or search warrant, as applicable, outlining the request made and the actions taken by the law enforcement agency.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment inserted “or internet service” in the section heading; rewrote (a) and (b) and added (c).

History.

Acts 2015, No. 405, § 1; 2019, No. 584, §
1.

12-12-1903. Limitation of liability.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a commercial mobile radio service provider or an internet service provider, or the officers, employees, assigns, or agents of a commercial mobile radio service provider or an internet service provider are not liable for civil damages or criminal liability in connection with the development, design, installation, operation, maintenance, performance, release, or provision of location information or geolocation information or for any failure to timely process or release any request for location information or geolocation information as may be necessary under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 405, § 1; 2019, No. 584, §
1.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment inserted “or internet service provider”, substituted “or the officers” for “or its officers”, inserted “of a commercial mobile radio service provider or an internet service provider”, and inserted “or geolocation information” twice.

12-12-1904. Providers to submit contact information to Arkansas Crime Information Center.

A commercial mobile radio service provider or internet service provider either authorized to do business in the state or that has submitted to the jurisdiction of the state shall immediately submit all contact information to the Arkansas Crime Information Center and shall immediately update the contact information as changes occur.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 405, § 1; 2019, No. 584, §
1.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment inserted “or internet service provider”.

12-12-1905. Additional duties of Arkansas Crime Information Center.

The Arkansas Crime Information Center shall make available the contact information obtained under §12-12-1904 on at least a quarterly basis or immediately as changes occur to each public safety agency in the state.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 405, § 1; 2019, No. 584, §
1.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment made no changes to this section.

12-12-1906. Prohibition against abuse.

A commercial mobile radio service provider or internet service provider that believes the requirements of this subchapter are being abused by a law enforcement agency or a specific law enforcement officer may report the suspected abuse to the Division of Arkansas State Police for further investigation.

If the law enforcement agency that the commercial mobile radio service provider or internet service provider believes is abusing the requirements of this subchapter is the Division of Arkansas State Police, the commercial mobile radio service provider or internet service provider may report the suspected abuse to the Attorney General.

Cross References. Antiarson information from insurance applicants, §23-88-201 et seq.

State Fire Prevention Commission, §20-22-201 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1955, No. 254, § 21: July 1, 1955.

Acts 1981, No. 45, § 15: July 1, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the agencies, departments, and programs now performed through the Department of Public Safety could more efficiently and economically perform their respective duties and responsibilities through reorganized agencies and departments operating as separate entities; that substantial savings could be made by eliminating the central services of the Department of Public Safety; and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to provide for advance planning for more efficient administration after the close of the current fiscal biennium of the various public safety programs of this state. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1981.”

Acts 1981, No. 540, § 18: July 1, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Third General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two-year period; that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1981 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1981 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and providing of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1981.”

Acts 2015, No. 874, § 2: Apr. 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that aspects of the Arkansas Fire Prevention Code are in conflict with the requirements of the Americans with Disability Act Standard for Accessible Design, and that this act is essential to ensure compliance with federal law. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 584, § 1.

12-11-106 — 12-11-109. [Repealed.]